Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2214
Secretary of State; names of corporations; certify to Attorney General; legally disqualified officer, shareholder, agent, or employee; action for dissolution.

The Secretary of State shall certify to the Attorney General, from time to time, the names of all corporations organized pursuant to the provisions of sections 21-2201 to 21-2222 which have failed to comply with the provisions of section 21-2213. Whenever the Secretary of State shall certify the name of the corporation to the Attorney General as having given cause for dissolution, the Secretary of State shall concurrently mail to the corporation at its registered office a notice that such certification has been made. Upon the receipt of such certification, the Attorney General shall file an action in the name of the state against such corporation for its dissolution.

Laws 1969, c. 121, § 14, p. 559.